Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-225
Utility, defined.

Utility shall mean an entity which provides electricity or natural gas to retail customers in the state.

Laws 1983, LB 626, § 25;

Laws 1991, LB 253, § 28.